Hawaii statutes.
[§634-27] Substituted service of summons in
attachment cases. In all cases where a writ of attachment is issued out of
any court in accordance with chapter 651, relating to attachments, if it
appears by affidavit or otherwise to the satisfaction of the judge that the
defendant in attachment was never a resident of the State, or has removed
therefrom, or that the defendant secretes oneself so that process cannot be
personally served upon the defendant, the judge may order that service be made
by publication as provided in section 634-23, or in the manner provided in
section 634-24, and with like effect. Upon the trial of the cause the
defendant thus summoned, if the defendant does not appear, may be declared to
be in default, and the court may proceed to hearing and judgment, and may issue
execution against the property upon which attachment has been levied. [L 1917,
c 67, §1; RL 1925, §2345; am L 1929, c 43, §3; RL 1935, §4081; RL 1945, §10063;
RL 1955, §230-34; HRS §634-61; ren HRS §634-27; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 4(e), (f), 64, 69.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next